apertium-kha.kha.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
! + - Case Markers
%[%-nmz%] !nominalizer
%[%+nmz%] !nominalizer
%[%-abs%] ! abstract noun
%[%+abs%] ! abstract noun
%[%-prog%] !progressive
%[%+prog%] !progressive
%[%-futAsp%] !future aspect (nouns)
%[%+futAsp%] !future aspect (nouns)
%[%-pastAsp%] !past aspect (adverbs)
%[%+pastAsp%] !past aspect (adverbs)
%[%-caus%] !causative
%[%+caus%] !causative
%[%-emph%] !emphasis (it is I/you)
%[%+emph%] !emphasis (it is I/you)
%[%+adjize%] ! adjectivize
%[%-adjize%] ! adjectivize 


! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<nmz%>   ! Noun
%<vblex%>   ! lexical verb
%<vbser%>   ! to be/linking verb
%<adj%>  ! Adjective
%<adv%>  ! Adverb
%<pr%>   ! Preposition
%<prn%>   ! Pronoun
%<art%>   ! Article

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular

!Gender/plurality

! Gender
%<f%>   ! Feminine
%<m%>   ! Masculine
%<GD%>   ! Either gender

! Person markers
%<p1%>    ! 1st Person
%<p2%>    ! 2nd Person
%<p3%>    ! 3rd Person

! Tense
%<pres%>  ! Present
%<past%>
%<inf%>
%<fut%>
%<dim%>
%<rel%>

%<sent%>
%<quot%>
%<lpar%>
%<rpar%>
%<cm%>
%<guio%>
%<apos%>
%<lquot%>
%<rquot%>


! Voice
%<actv%>  ! Active

! Other symbols
%>        ! Morpheme boundary
%<comp%>  ! Comparative
%<sup%>   ! Superlative
%<dem%>   ! Demonstrative
%<adjize%> ! adjectivize
%<nonKhasi%> !not a Khasi word (ie English)
%<near%>   ! near
%<far%>   ! in sight far
%<osfar%>   ! out of sight far 
%<prox%>   ! Proximal (this) 
%<dist%>   ! Distal (that)
%<up%>     ! (that) up (there)
%<conj%>   ! Conjunction
%<cont%>   ! continued state or action
%<cert%>   ! certainty or nearness of a future or contemplated action
%<cnjcoo%> ! coordinating conjunction
%<abs%>    ! abstract noun
%<prog%>    ! progressive aspect (verb)
%<futAsp%>    ! future aspect (noun)
%<pastAsp%>    ! past aspect (adverb)
%<caus%>    ! causative 
%<emph%>    ! emphasis (personal pronoun)
%<pers%> !personal (in personal pronouns)
%<impCop%> !copula implicit
%<large%> !copula implicit

%<neg%>    ! negative
%<negInd%> !goes with negative tag and indicates that it's really a negative and not soemthing else
%<proper%> ! should, ought
%<refl%> ! reflexive
%<poss%> ! possessive
%<iv%> ! intransitive
%<tv%> ! transitive
%<pass%> ! passive
%<imp%> ! imperative
%<dirObj%> ! direct object marker (particle)
%<inter%> ! interrogative
%  !space
%- !dash
%+
% 
%~
%.

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Prefixes ;
Affixes ;
Prepositions ;
Verbs ;
Particles ;
Articles ;
Conjunctions ;
Adverb ;
Punctuation ;
Demonstratives ;
Nominals;
NonKhasiWordsInCorpus;

LEXICON nounInflF
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%-kynthei Tags ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>% kynthei Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>kynthei Tags ; ! Dir/LR
!plural diminutives
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-ria Tags ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>ria Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% ria Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-rit Tags ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>rit Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% rit Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-khun Tags ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>khun Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% khun Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-raid Tags ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>raid Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% raid Tags ;  ! Dir/L
!bah, meaning great/big
%<n%>%<f%>%<large%>:%>%-bah Tags ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<large%>:%>%bah Tags ;
! the regular stuff
%<n%>%<f%>:%> Tags ;

LEXICON nounInflM
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%-shinrang Tags ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>% shinrang Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>shinrang Tags ; ! Dir/LR
!plural diminutives
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-ria Tags ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>ria Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% ria Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-rit Tags ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>rit Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% rit Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-khun Tags ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>khun Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% khun Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-raid Tags ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>raid Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% raid Tags ;  ! Dir/L
!bah, meaning great/big
%<n%>%<m%>%<large%>:%>%-bah Tags ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<large%>:%>%bah Tags ;
! the regular stuff
%<n%>%<m%>:%> Tags ;


LEXICON nounInflGD
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%-kynthei Tags ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>% kynthei Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>kynthei Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%-shinrang Tags ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>% shinrang Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>shinrang Tags ; ! Dir/LR
!plural diminutives
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-ria Tags ;
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>ria Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% ria Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-rit Tags ;
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>rit Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% rit Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-khun Tags ;
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>khun Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% khun Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-raid Tags ;
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>raid Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% raid Tags ;  ! Dir/L
!bah, meaning great/big
%<n%>%<GD%>%<large%>:%>%-bah Tags ;
%<n%>%<GD%>%<large%>:%>%bah Tags ;
! the regular stuff
%<n%>%<GD%>:%> Tags ;

LEXICON nounInflDim
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-kynthei Tags ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% kynthei Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>kynthei Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-shinrang Tags ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% shinrang Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>shinrang Tags ; ! Dir/LR
!plural diminutives
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-ria Tags ;
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>ria Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% ria Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-rit Tags ;
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>rit Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% rit Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-khun Tags ;
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>khun Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% khun Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>%-raid Tags ;
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>raid Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<GD%>%<pl%>%<dim%>:%>% raid Tags ;  ! Dir/L
! the regular stuff
%<n%>%<GD%>%<dim%>:%> Tags ;


LEXICON Tags
%<abs%>%[%+abs%]: # ;
%<nmz%>%[%+nmz%]: # ;
%<prog%>%[%+prog%]: # ;
%<futAsp%>%[%+futAsp%]: # ;
%<pastAsp%>%[%+pastAsp%]: # ;
%<caus%>%[%+caus%]: # ;
%<emph%>%[%+emph%]: # ;
%<adjize%>%[%+adjize%]: # ;
# ;

LEXICON VerbInflT
%<vblex%>%<tv%>:%> Tags ;

LEXICON VerbInflI
%<vblex%>%<iv%>:%> Tags ;

LEXICON prepInfl
%<pr%>:%> prepCont ;

LEXICON AdjInfl
%<adj%>%<sup%>:%>% tam Tags ;
%<adj%>%<sup%>:%>% kham%-tam Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<adj%>%<sup%>:%>% shikkadei Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<adj%>%<sup%>:%>% eh Tags ; ! Dir/LR
%<adj%>:%> Tags ;

LEXICON AdverbInfl
%<adv%>:%> Tags ;

LEXICON CooConjunctionInfl
%<coocnj%>:%> Tags ;

LEXICON ConjunctionInfl
%<conj%>:%> Tags ;

LEXICON PartInfl
!relative pronouns/person markers + n (fut) and m (neg) and la (past)
%<fut%>:%>n Tags ;
%<neg%>:%>m Tags ;
%<past%>:%>la Tags ;
Tags ;

LEXICON prepCont
!relative pronouns/person markers + n (fut) and m (neg) and la (past)
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>:%>u Tags ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<f%>:%>ka Tags ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<GD%>:%>ki Tags ;
Tags ;

LEXICON nonKhasiInfl
%<n%>%<nonKhasi%>:%> # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Nominals

PersonalPronouns ;
RelativePronouns ;
ReflexivePossessivePronouns ;
InterrogativePronouns ;
NounRoot ;
Adjectives ;

LEXICON NounRoot
pa:pa nounInflDim; ! father
phang:phang nounInflF ; ! quarter, side, allotted part.
shakri:shakri nounInflGD ; ! a servant
Adam:Adam nounInflM ; ! Adam from Genesis (IE Adam and Eve)
sengbhalang:sengbhalang nounInflGD ; ! [unknown definition]
nong:nong nounInflF ; ! wages, gain, profit; a hired man or woman; anything given out for hire
shynrang:shynrang nounInflM ; ! a male, a pipe
bampong:bampong nounInflGD ; ! cancer, scrofula.
khanna:khanna nounInflGD ; ! a particular last name
klur:klur nounInflF ; ! one crore
ophisar:ophisar nounInflM ; ! officer
masi:masi nounInflGD ; ! a cow, bull; an ox
kyrwoh:kyrwoh nounInflGD ; ! a link, a ring
madan:madan nounInflF ; ! a plain
pulit:pulit nounInflF ; ! a lock-up, a private room; a policeman
pynursla:pynursla nounInflF ; ! a city called pynursla in India
kmen:kmen nounInflGD ; ! joy
tit:tit nounInflM ; ! a mushroom, a fungus
tnad:tnad nounInflF ; ! seems to always introduce groups/committees, but not sure of exact definition
daw:daw nounInflGD ; ! a cause, an excuse.
sangma:sangma nounInflM ; ! Purno Agitok (P. A.) Sangma, a politician
jaiñtia:jaiñtia nounInflF ; ! Jaintia people/hills
ïaiong:ïaiong nounInflM ; ! april
myntri:myntri nounInflGD ; !Minister
liang:liang nounInflF ; !side, party; plate
samla:samla nounInflGD ; ! a youth
Khasi:Khasi nounInflM ; !Khasi
Shillong:Shillong nounInflF ; !capitol city
blei:blei nounInflM ; ! A man
pyrthei:pyrthei nounInflGD ; ! earth, world !can be masculine or feminine
miet:miet nounInflF ; ! night
kbeit:kbeit nounInflM ; !hawk
prek:prek nounInflM ;
sner:sner nounInflF ;
ngap:ngap nounInflM ;
kur:kur nounInflGD ;
syiem:syiem nounInflM ;
duriaw:duriaw nounInflF ; !sea
LEXICON Verbs
thep:thep VerbInflT ; ! to stow, to put in
ïashim:ïashim VerbInflI ; ! [unsure of definition]
kynnoh:kynnoh VerbInflT ; ! to pronounce; to blame, find fault with
beh:beh VerbInflT ; ! to send away, to expel, to pursue, to seek
kit:kit VerbInflI ; ! to carry on the back with a head strap; to bear; to be responsible for
man:man VerbInflT ; ! be, become, grow, submit, thrive
riew:riew VerbInflI ; ! to produce a sound
ïarap:ïarap VerbInflT ; ! to help, assist
dep:dep VerbInflT ; !  to finish
beit:beit VerbInflI ; ! to agree.
noh:noh VerbInflT ; ! to throw into
don:don VerbInflI ; !is, has, exists
long%<vbser%>:long Tags ; ! be
pynlong%<vbser%>:pynlong Tags ; !cause to exist, happen, be
dei:dei VerbInflT ; ! have, ought, should
leit:leit VerbInflI ; !go
buh:buh VerbInflT ; !put
keiñ:keiñ VerbInflI ; ! that is it (verb)
bet:bet VerbInflT ; !sow
iathuh:iathuh VerbInflI ; !describe
isat:isat VerbInflI; !be disgusting
khih:khih VerbInflT; !shake
wallam:wallam VerbInflI; !bring
suda%<vblex%>%<pass%>%<tv%>:suda Tags ; ! be empty
ïaid:ïaid VerbInflT ; ! to walk, go, proceed
ïalang:ïalang VerbInflI ; ! gather together
juh:juh VerbInflI ; ! to like, to get tamed; to feel quite at home
LEXICON Adverb
kumne:kumne AdverbInfl ; ! thus, like this
hato:hato AdverbInfl ; ! then
katkum:katkum AdverbInfl ; ! according, as much as
hangne:hangne AdverbInfl ; ! here
shuwa:shuwa AdverbInfl ; ! first, before, previously, beforehand
lei:lei AdverbInfl ; ! why? For what reason? 
khamtam:khamtam AdverbInfl ; ! above, chiefly, particularly, principally
ju:ju AdverbInfl ; !in the habit of, used to
shu:shu AdverbInfl; !just, only
pat:pat AdverbInfl ; ! again
kum:kum AdverbInfl ; ! like, as, unintentionally
shisien:shisien AdverbInfl ; ! once, at one time
LEXICON Adjectives
stad:stad AdjInfl ; ! wise, clever, learned
lut:lut AdjInfl ; ! spent, exhausted
hajar:hajar AdjInfl ; ! a thousand
ma:ma AdjInfl ; !dangerous, frightful
pynban:pynban AdjInfl ; ! still, nevertheless
shi:shi AdjInfl ; ! one
uwei:uwei AdjInfl ; ! one
bapher:bapher AdjInfl ; !different, distinct
bun:bun AdjInfl ; !many, much
mynnyngkong:mynnyngkong AdjInfl ; ! beginning
thymmai:thymmai AdjInfl ; !new 
bakhraw:bakhraw AdjInfl ;
LEXICON NonKhasiWordsInCorpus
committee:committee nonKhasiInfl ; 
India:India nonKhasiInfl ;
a:a nonKhasiInfl ;
i:i nonKhasiInfl ;
q:q nonKhasiInfl ;
y:y nonKhasiInfl ;
congress:congress nonKhasiInfl ;
officer:officer nonKhasiInfl ;
meet:meet nonKhasiInfl ;
college:college nonKhasiInfl ;
central:central nonKhasiInfl ;
NPP:NPP nonKhasiInfl ;
